Utah statutes.
15-9-112.   Student-athlete's right to cancel.
(1)  A student-athlete may cancel an agency contract by giving notice of the
cancellation to the athlete agent in a record within 14 days after the
contract is signed.
(2)  A student-athlete may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.
(3)  If a student-athlete cancels an agency contract, the student-athlete is
not required to pay any consideration under the contract or to return any
consideration received from the athlete agent to induce the student-athlete to
enter into the contract.
